src/twol-myv.twolc
Alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я  
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я


! Nominal stem vowels that alternate 
! work with "+VLoss" and "+NoVLoss" tags
!
У2:о
У2:0
И2:е
И2:ь
И2:0


!Suffix final variant vowel for hard vs soft
Ь2:ь !
Ь2:0 !

! verbal stem consonant that appear in PretI 3sg
!Т1:0 !

! derivational suffix protovowel with "o" and "a" 
!realisation  in deverbal noun ending
А1:а !

! conjugational suffix protovowels 
!showing "a" vs "я" and "ы" vs "и" alternation
А2:а !А2
А2:я !А2
Ы2:и !
Ы2:ы !

! derivational suffix protovowel  "mo" and "me"
О1:е !
О1:э !
О1:о !
О1:0 !

! clitic proto consonant
Г1:г !
Г1:к !
Г1:0 !



! Prolative Ga
Г2:г !
Г2:к !
Г2:в !


! Imperative clitic proto consonant
Г4:г !
Г4:к !
Г4:0 !
!Replace these with "G1" but apply stem final "K4" to
!




! imperative suffix
К1:к !

!

! connegative suffix rendering vowel
! панемс пань>О1К3 : пан00е0
К3:0 !

! Stem final on Imperative Verbs
!!К4:0 !


! Some verbs need a marker for vowel placement
!Used before Conjuntive ending
!V1:е !
!V1:э !2012-03-13 look to О1:
!V1:о !
! I2 and U2 adjectives and nouns need this with their "t" and "s"
!V2:0 

TLoss:0
SLoss:0
KLoss:0
VLoss:0
WLoss:0
NoVLoss:0

%- !Hyphen with constructions like "-buti"
%>:0

;


Sets

Vows = а о у ы э я ё ю и е ;
verbStemVows = а о э я ё е ;
verbStemVowStrong = а о э я ё е ;
noGlideVow = а о у ы э ;
glideVow = я ё ю и е ;
BTV = а о у я ё ю ; ! Back Trigger Vowels
FTV = ы и е э ; ! Front Trigger Vowels

Cons = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
NPC = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ; ! Nonpalatal Consonants
ConsVoiced = б в г д ж з й л м н р ;
ConsVoicedDent = д з л н р ;
ConsVoicedNonDent = б в г ж й м ;
ConsVoiceless = к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
ConsVoicelessDent = с т ц ;
ConsVoicelessNonDent = к п ф х ч ш щ ;
ConsNonDent = б в г ж к м п ф х ч ш щ ;
ConsDent = д з л н р с т ц  ;
ConsDentNoL = д з н р с т ц  ;

Letters = Vows Cons ь ъ ;

Definitions

! Front Trigger Consonants (less ль)
FTC = [ й: | д ь: | з ь: | н ь: | р ь: | с ь: | т ь: | ц ь: ] ;

! All Consonants
AC = [ FTC | л ь | NPC ] ;

! Left Front Context Soft
LFCS = [ [ FTV AC* [ Cons - ConsDent ] ] | FTV AC* FTC | [ BTV FTC [ AC* [ Cons - ConsDent ] ]* ] ] ;

! Left Front Context Hard
LFCH =[ [ :FTV AC* ConsDent ] | [ BTV FTC [ AC* ConsDent ]+ ] | [ BTV л ь [ к с ] ] ] ;

! Left Back Context
LBC = [ [ BTV ( %>:0 ) NPC+ ] | [ BTV л ь [[ NPC* NPC ] - [ :* к с ] ] ] ] ;

PossX = [ м | н Ь2: | т Ь2: | н т Ь2: | н О1: к | н к | с т ] ;

! Suffix-Initial Variable Vowel
SIVV = [ PossX | в | н е н ь | т е н ь | т е т ь | н с т э н ь | н с т О1: | н т е н ь | л ь | л и | к с | ш к а | м О1: к | с | з ( %>:0 ) О1: | н з О1: | т ь | н т ь: | н ь: | в ( О1: ) л | м А1: | м г а | т с ь | т с т ь | з ь: ] ;

SubseqBackHarm = [ А2:а | а | О1:о | У2:о | о | а:я | у| А2:я | я | ё | ю ] ;
Back =  :* [SubseqBackHarm \[ :FTV | :й | :ь | И2: ]* ( л ь ) [NPC]]  ;




!2007.04.11
!didn't accept istoriya, ideya
!accepted aziya, liya [:* - SubseqBackHarm*]] ;


Rules


!Changes in the stem vowels before "10", "20", "30" and "60"
"verbStemVowStrong:0"
 X:Y <=> [ Cons | Vows ] _  %>:0 [А2:я|А2:а [ н | т ]| Ы2:] ;
!                   Cons  _ К4:0 %>:0  Ы2: ;
          where X in (а о э ы у я ё е и ю)
                Y in (0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0) matched ;


!
!Vowels in Nouns and Adjectives 
!2006-12-02
!"YI3:y"
!И3:ь <=>  ConsDent  _ [%>:0  [Г1:г|Г1:к|Г2:г|Г2:к|с [%>:0 |#: ] | с (т) О1:э |:ConsNonDent]| #:] ;
!      .#.   :* л  _ [%>:0 (в:0) :Cons|#:] ;
!


! Deverbal noun in ОмА
"A1:o"
А1:о <=>  [ а |я ] %>:0  м  _ ;

"Y2:yi"
Ы2:и <=> [ я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | ю:0 | ь:0 | й:0 | ConsNonDent (noGlideVow:0)]  %>:0 _ ;


"O1:ye"
О1:е <=>  [ :е | :э | FTV %>:0 ] м  _  [ #: | %- | %>:0 [Г1:0 | SIVV | д: О1: ] | л  ] ;
          [ ь:0 | й:0 ] %>:0   _   %>:0  д: О1:  ;
         [[ LFCS | :FTV ] %>:0 | :FTV ] [ н | м ] _ к ;
         [[ LFCS | л ь: ] %>:0 | :FTV ( ( %>:0 ) м ) ( %>:0 ) | [ О1:е | О1:э ] %>:0 | :FTV ( %>:0 ) [н Ь2:0 | т Ь2:0 | н О1: к | н к ]  %>:0  ] д:  _ [ %>:0 [ Г1:0 |  SIVV ] | #: ] ;
         [ LFCS | FTV | FTC | л ь] %>:0  [в:0 | в ] т _ м [ О1:0 | О1:е ] ;
          [ ConsDent: ь:0 | Vows й:0 ] %>:0 _ [( %>:0 ) SIVV | К3:0 | #: | %>:0 Г1:0 ] ;
          LFCS %>:0 _  [ SIVV | К3:0 ] ;
         [ FTV %>:0 | FTV в:0 %>:0 WLoss:0 | :FTV ] в _ л [ ь | и ] ;
         

!
"O1:e"
О1:э <=>  [ LFCH | :FTV ( %>:0 ) с т ] %>:0 д:  _ [ %>:0 [ Г1:0 | SIVV ] | #: ] ;
         [[[ LFCH | LFCS | ь: | й: | :FTV | :FTV ( %>:0 ) [ PossX | т ь: | н т ь: | н ь:  ] ] %>:0 ] | И2:0 %>:0 VLoss:0 | [FTV %>:0 | %>:0 [ О1:э | О1:е ] ] м ] (з | с ) с (т) _  [ #: |%>:0 [Г1:0 | SIVV |т | н| с |Г2:в |д: |л ]] ;
          [[[[ LFCH | LFCS | :FTV ] %>:0 | :FTV ] [ (н) з | к с %>:0 ]| [LFCH | LFCS | :FTV | ь: | И2: ] %>:0 ( VLoss:0 ) [ з | н Ь2:0 | т Ь2:0 | н О1: к | н к | с т ] %>:0 ] | [ :е | :э | FTV %>:0 ] м с %>:0  | LFCH %>:0 ] _ [ #: | (%>:0) [ SIVV | л ] | %>:0 [ Г1:0 | д О1: ] ] ;
         LFCH %>:0 в:0 т _ м [О1:0|О1:е] ;
          LFCH  %>:0 _ SIVV ;
!!2012-03-14

!
"O1:o"
О1:о <=> [ О1:о | :BTV %>:0 ]  м ( с %>:0 )  _  [ #: | %- |%>:0 [Г1:0 | SIVV | д: О1: ] | л ] ;
         [ %>:0 О1:о ( н ) ] з _ [ %>:0  [ м | н Ь2:0 | н* т Ь2:0  | н з О1:о | н О1:о к | н к | с т ] [ %>:0 [ Г1:0 | Г1:г | Г1:к ] а: | #: | %- ] | [ %>:0 [ Г1:0 | Г1:г | Г1:к ] а: | #: | %- ] ] ; ! Px3Sg
         [[ LBC | :BTV ] %>:0 | :BTV ] [ н | м ] _ к ; ! Px1Pl
         [ LBC %>:0 | :BTV ( ( %>:0 ) м ) ( %>:0 ) | О1:о %>:0 | :BTV ( %>:0 ) PossX %>:0 ] д:  _ [ %>:0 [ Г1:0 |  SIVV ]| #: | %- ] ; ! +Abl
         [ LBC | :BTV ((%>:0) PossX) ] %>:0 в: т _ м [О1:0|О1:о] ; ! +Abe
         [[[ LBC | :BTV | :BTV (%>:0) PossX ] %>:0 | У2:0 %>:0 VLoss:0 | [ BTV %>:0 | О1:о ] м ] ( з | с ) с (т) | LBC %>:0 ] _  [ #: | %- | %>:0 [ Г1:0 | SIVV |т | н| с |Г2:в |д: |л ]] ; !
         [[[ LBC | :BTV ] %>:0 | :BTV ] [ (н) з | к с %>:0 ] | [ У2: %>:0 ( VLoss:0 ) | [ LBC | :BTV ] %>:0 ] [ з | н Ь2:0 | т Ь2:0 | н О1:о к | н к | с т ] %>:0 ] _  [ #: | %- | %>:0 [ Г1:0 | т | н| с | Г2:в | д: О1: ] | ( %>:0 ) [ SIVV | л ]] ;
         [ BTV %>:0 | BTV в:0 %>:0 WLoss:0 | :BTV ] в _ л [ ь | и ] ;
         LBC ( Ь2:0 ) %>:0 _ [( %>:0 ) SIVV | #: | %- | %>:0 Г1:0  | К3:0 ] ;
         :BTV ( %>:0 ) з  %>:0 _ [ т Ь2: | н Ь2: | м | н з | с т | н О1: к | н к ] ; 
!!2012-03-14

"O1:0"
О1:0 <=>   _  %>:0 [А2:а|А2:я] ;


!!Changes in the suffix vowels
"A2:ya"
А2:я <=> [ FTC | :FTV | ь | LFCS :FTV* ( (н) т ( Ь2: ) | н Ь2: ) ]  %>:0 [ т | TLoss:0 ( %>:0 ) т:0 ] _  [ д | н | м ] ;
         [ ConsDent [ И2:0 | ь:0 |я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | и:0 | ю:0 ]| Vows [ я:0 | ё:0 | е:0 | ю:0 | й:0 ] | [ LFCS ( :FTV ) %>:0  | О1:е | О1:э ] ( (н) т  Ь2:0  | н Ь2: )  ]  %>:0  _ [ т | н ] ;


!HERE
"A2:a"
А2:а <=> [[ :BTV | LBC ] %>:0 [ т | TLoss:0 ( %>:0 ) т:0 ] | %>:0 ( О1: ) м с %>:0 т ] _  [ д | н ] ;
         [ConsDent ( э:0 | ы:0 | О1:0 | а:0 | о:0 | у:0 )|  в: т О1: м  О1:0 | ConsNonDent ( Vows:0 | И2:0 ) | У2:0 | [ LBC ( :BTV ) %>:0  |  О1:о ]  ((н) т Ь2:0 | н Ь2: )  ] %>:0  _  [ т | н ] ;



"j:0"
й:0 <=> Vows _ [И2:е  | %>:0 Ы2:и| (И2:0)  %>:0 [А2:я | О1:е [ :Cons | К3:0 ]] ] ;


!
!18.04.2007 Adding "U2:" and contemplating environment "%>:0 т н _"
!
"ye:e always"
е:э <=
          ConsDent (О1:0) %>:0  н _ [[ #: | %-|%>:0 Г1:0 а:я]| н ь: | к] ;
          [[[Back - [:* Vows]] %>:0| ConsDent]  %>:0| У2:0 %>:0 VLoss:0 ( TLoss:0 ) ] т: н _ [ #: | %- |%>:0 [Г1:0 а:я |т| л|Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


"ye:e sometimes"
е:э =>
          [ConsDent|ConsNonDent] ( О1:0 ) %>:0  н _ [[ #: | %-|%>:0 Г1:0 а:я]|н ь:|к ] ;
          [ ConsDent | ConsNonDent | м:0 ]  ( О1:0 | У2:0 ) %>:0 ( VLoss:0 ) ( TLoss:0 ) т: н _ [ #: | %- | %>:0 [Г1:0 а:я | т | л | Г2:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


"a:ya"
а:я  <=> :Vows ((%>:0) К3:0 )  %>:0 Г1:0 _  ;


!Changes in suffix consonants
"v:0"
в:0 <=> [ :Cons  ( ь: ) ] %>:0 _ т [О1:о|О1:е|О1:э] м [О1:о|О1:е|О1:0] ;
        :Vows _ %>:0 WLoss:0 [ в О1: л | в л ] ;

!!!Depricated due to 
!!ERROR: Label not found in 'EQV_LABELS' (114) **
!!Solved in several contexts by declaring both lexical
!!and surface forms in the alphabet.
"G1:0"
Г1:0 <=> [ :Vows ((%>:0) К3:0 )  %>:0 | К1: Ь2:0 %>:0 KLoss:0 | :к %>:0 KLoss:0 ] _ а: ;

"G1:g"
Г1:г <=> [ConsVoicedDent (:ь|Ь2:0)| й | [ ConsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь )] %>:0 _ а ;

"G1:k"
Г1:к <=>  [ ConsVoicelessDent ( :ь | Ь2:0 | Ь2:ь ) | ConsVoicelessNonDent | г | К1: Ь2: | К4:0 ] :0* %>:0 _ а  ;
          

!Prolative
"G2:g"
Г2:г <=> [ ConsVoicedDent ( :ь )| [ ConsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь ) ] %>:0 _ а ;

"G2:v"! 
Г2:в <=> [ :Vows (:0) %>:0 | :Vows ] _ а [ #: | %- |%>:0 [Г1:0 | SIVV |т | н | с | д: | в | к с | л ] ];


"G2:k"
Г2:к <=>  [ ConsVoicelessDent ( :ь )| ConsVoicelessNonDent ( :ь )| г ] %>:0 _ а [ #: | %- |%>:0 [Г1:0 | SIVV |т | н| с |д: |в |к с| л ] ] ;
           Vows ConsVoiceless [У2:0 | И2:0 ] %>:0 VLoss:0 _ а ;

!!Depricated
!!"G3:g" !Imperative Clitics
!!Г4:г  <=> з ь %>:0 _ а ;
!!
!!!
!!"G4:0"
!!Г4:0  <=>
!!           К1: %>:0 _ а ;
!!  [О1:е|О1:о] %>:0 _ а: ;
!
!
!!"G3:k"
!!Г4:к  <=>  #: [и л я|у ж о|а з ё|а д я|а й д а] %>:0 _ а  ;


"m:0" 
м:0 <=> 
 BTV  _ У2:0  %>:0  VLoss: [ т| т н е:э ] ;
        т (ь) _ [У2:|И2:]  %>:0  VLoss: [с (т) [О1:э|О1:о|О1:0]|с [#: | %-| %>:0 [Г1:0|Г1:к]]] ;



!! imperative suffix
"K1:t"
К1:т <=>  [ Cons ( ь: ) ] %>:0 _  ;



! Suffix final hard vs soft
!Adding "И2:0" 18.04.2007
"U4:y"
Ь2:ь <=>  [[[ LFCS | :FTV | ь: ] %>:0 | О1:е | О1:э ] [ н | ( н | в ) т ] | И2:0 %>:0 VLoss:0 т | [ LFCS | ь: | :FTV ] %>:0 К1:т ]  _  [ #: | %- | %>:0  Г1: ] ;


!!TLoss sloppy
"t:0"
т:0 <=> [ [ т | К1:т ] ( Ь2: ) %>:0 TLoss:0 | т У2:0 %>:0 VLoss:0 TLoss:0 ] ( %>:0 ) _ ;

!!SLoss s s > s = s 0 0 s
"s:0"
с:0 <=> с _ %>:0 SLoss:0 с ;

!Ablative d/t
"d:t"
д:т  <=> [ ConsVoiceless | д | г] (ь:0)  %>:0 _ [О1:е|О1:э|О1:о] ;
         т [ У2:0 | И2:0 ] %>:0 VLoss:0 _ [О1:е|О1:э|О1:о] ;
!Word final Vowels


"y:0"
ь:0 <=>        ConsDent  _  %>:0 [ А2:я | Ы2:и | О1:е [ ( %>:0 ) SIVV | К3:0 | #: | %- | %>:0 [ Г1:0 | д О1: ] ] ];
              ConsDentNoL _ %>:0 [в:0 т О1:е м [О1:е|О1:0] | К1: | н | д: | т | с (т) [ ь: | е: ]] ;



"U2:0"
У2:0 <=>  _ %>:0 VLoss:0 [ ( TLoss:0 ) т [ Ь2:0 | Ь2:ь | А2:а ] | ( TLoss:0 ) т: н е: |с (т) [О1:о|О1:0]| с [ %>:0 |  #: | %- ] ] ;
          _ %>:0 VLoss:0 д: [ О1:о ] ;

"U2:o"
У2:о  <=>  _ [ %>:0 [ (н) т Ь2:0 | н Ь2:0 | т н е: | с ь: | с (т) [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | с [ %>:0 |  #: | %- ] | з %>:0 О1: | л  |  (н) з [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | ш к а | к с | н | в | Г2:в | д | с т [ %>:0 |  #: | %- ] ] | Г1:0|  #: | %-] ;


"YI2:0 sometimes"
И2:0 <=> Cons _ %>:0 VLoss:0 т [Ь2:0|Ь2:ь |н е: |А2:я [д|н]] ;
         ConsNonDent: _ %>:0 VLoss:0 [с (т) [О1:э|О1:0]| с [ %>:0 |  #: | %- ] ] ;
         [NPC|й:0] _ %>:0 [ А2:я|А2:а] ;
            _  %>:0 VLoss:0 д: [О1:е|О1:э] ;
         Vows ConsVoiceless _ %>:0 (VLoss:0) Г2:к а ;

"YI2:y"
И2:ь  <=>  ConsDent _ %>:0 VLoss:0 [с (т) [О1:э|О1:0]| с [ %>:0 |  #: | %- ] ] ;


"YI2:ye"
И2:е  <=>   _ [ %>:0 [т [Ь2:0|Ь2:ь]|т н е|с ь:|с (т) [О1:э|О1:0] |с (т) ь:| с [ %>:0 |  #: | %- ] | з %>:0 О1:э | л  |  (н) з [ О1:э | О1:0 ] | ш к а | к с | н | в | д | с т [ %>:0 |  #: | %- ]] |  Г1:0|  #: | %- ] ;


!Disallow

"Disallow TLoss after non-t"
TLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :т ] ] %>:0 _ ;

"Disallow KLoss after non-k"
KLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :к ] ] %>:0 _ ;

"Disallow SLoss after non-s"
SLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :с ] ] %>:0 _ ;

"Disallow VLoss after non-U2I2"
VLoss:0 /<= [[ :* [ Letters | А1: | А2: | Ы2: | К1: | О1: | Ь2: | Г1: | Г2: | К3:  ] ] - [ :* [ У2: | И2: ] ] ] %>:0 _ ;

"Disallow WLoss after non-v"
WLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* [ в л | в О1: л ] ] ] %>:0 _ ;
